Illinois, session 104th, SB3248.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. The following named amounts, or so much of 5those amounts as may be necessary, respectively, are 6appropriated to the Office of the State's Attorneys Appellate 7Prosecutor for the objects and purposes hereinafter named to 8meet its ordinary and contingent expenses for the fiscal year 9ending June 30, 2027: 10Payable from the General Revenue Fund:11  For Personal Services: 12  Collective Bargaining Unit.....................$7,860,60013  Administrative Unit............................$3,139,20014  For State Contribution to the State Employees' Retirement 15  System Pick Up: 16  Collective Bargaining Unit.......................$314,50017  Administrative Unit..............................$125,70018  For State Contribution to Social Security:19  Collective Bargaining Unit.......................$601,50020  Administrative Unit..............................$240,30021  For Contractual Services:22  General Contractual Services.....................$500,00023  Tax Objection Casework:........................... $3,500  SB3248- 2 -LRB104 18141 RLC 31580 b1  For Rental of Real Property:.......................$175,0002  For Travel: 3  General Travel....................................$36,5004  For Commodities:5  General Commodities...............................$20,0006  For Printing:........................................$7,0007  For Equipment: 8  General Equipment................................ $95,0009  For Electronic Data Processing:.....................$82,00010  For Telecommunications:.............................$89,00011  For Operation of Auto: 12  General Operation of Auto.........................$63,50013  For Continuing Legal Education:......................$4,60014  For Expenses Pursuant to P.A. 84-1340, which15   requires the Office of the State's Attorneys16   Appellate Prosecutor to conduct training17   programs for Illinois State's Attorneys,18   Assistant State's Attorneys and Law Enforcement19   Officers on techniques and methods of20   eliminating or reducing the trauma of21   testifying in criminal proceedings for22   children who serve as witnesses in such23   proceedings; and other authorized criminal24   justice training programs:........................$110,00025  For costs associated with pre-trial26  release pursuant to Section 110-2 of the  SB3248- 3 -LRB104 18141 RLC 31580 b1  Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963.............$4,679,0002  For a grant to the Cook County State's3   Attorney for expenses incurred in4   filing appeals in Cook County...................$6,900,0005General Revenue Total:............................$25,046,900 6Payable from State's Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor's County 7Fund8  For Personal Services:9  Administrative Unit............................$1,251,80010  For State Contribution to the State Employees' Retirement 11  System Pick Up: 12  Administrative Unit...............................$50,10013  For State Contribution to the State Employees' Retirement 14  System: 15  Administrative Unit..............................$575,20016  For State Contribution to Social Security:17  Administrative Unit...............................$95,90018  For County Reimbursement to State for Group Insurance:19  Administrative Unit..............................$362,00020  For Contractual Services: 21  General Contractual Services.....................$515,80022  Tax Objection Case Work...........................$16,00023  Labor Unit.......................................$257,00024  For Rental of Real Property:.......................$144,10025  For Travel:  SB3248- 4 -LRB104 18141 RLC 31580 b1  General Travel....................................$17,5002  For Commodities: 3  General Commodities................................$5,0004  For Printing:..........................................$8005  For Equipment:6  General Equipment..................................$2,2007  For Electronic Data Processing:.....................$35,4008  For Telecommunications:.............................$20,0009  For Operation of Automotive Equipment:10  General Operation of Auto..........................$6,50011  For Law Intern Program:.............................$18,200 12State's Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor 13County Fund Total:.................................$3,373,500 14Payable from Personal Property Tax Replacement Fund:15  For Personal Services:...........................$1,922,00016  For State Contribution to the State Employees'17  Retirement System Pick Up:........................$76,90018  For State Contribution to the State Employees' 19   Retirement System:................................$883,00020  For State Contribution to Social Security..........$147,10021  For Reimbursement to State for Group Insurance:....$398,40022  For Contractual Services:..........................$742,30023  For Training Programs:............................ $225,00024Personal Property Tax Replacement Fund Total.......$4,394,700    SB3248- 5 -LRB104 18141 RLC 31580 b1Payable from Continuing Legal Education Trust Fund: 2  For Continuing Legal Education:....................$100,0003Continuing Legal Education Trust Fund Total:.........$100,000 4Payable from the Narcotics Profit Forfeiture Fund:5  For Expenses Pursuant to Drug Asset Forfeiture6   Procedure Act:..................................$2,900,0007Narcotics Profit Forfeiture Fund Total:............$2,900,000 8Payable from the Special Federal Grant Fund:9  For Expenses Related to federally assisted10   Programs to assist local State's Attorneys 11   including special appeals, drug related12   cases, and cases arising under the13   Narcotics Profit Forfeiture Act on the14   request of the State's Attorney and monies15   received from the Department of Justice:...........$50,00016Special Federal Grant Fund Total......................$50,000 17Payable from the Cannabis Expungement Fund:18  For Distribution to local State's Attorneys19   for the facilitation of petitions of20   expungement of minor cannabis offenses,21   pursuant to the Cannabis Regulation  SB3248- 6 -LRB104 18141 RLC 31580 b1   and Tax Act.......................................$500,000 2(Total, $36,365,100; General Revenue Fund, $25,046,900; Office 3of the State's Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor's County Fund, 4$3,373,500; Personal Property Tax Replacement Fund, 5$4,394,700; Continuing Legal Education Trust Fund, $100,000; 6Narcotics Profit Forfeiture Fund, $2,900,000; Special Federal 7Grant Project Funds, $50,000; Cannabis Expungement Fund, 8$500,000) 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102026.